Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4291.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated to the Minnesota Racing Commission to supplement purses for races held exclusively for Minnesota-bred Thoroughbreds and provide grants, loans, and other financial incentives to breeders and owners, in order to promote, encourage, and support the Minnesota-bred Thoroughbred industry in the state and encourage breeding and racing of Thoroughbreds. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2029. new text end